Idaho, session 2026, S1246.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 7, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 18-713, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
18-713. LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS -- FACIAL COVERINGS. (1) As used in
this section:
(a) "Facial covering" means any opaque mask, garment, helmet, head-
gear, or other item that conceals or obscures the facial identity of
an individual, including but not limited to a balaclava, tactical
mask, gaiter, ski mask, and any similar type of facial covering or
face-shielding item. A facial covering shall not include any of the
following:
(i) A translucent face shield or clear mask that does not conceal
the wearer's facial identity;
(ii) An N95 medical mask or surgical mask to protect against
transmission of disease or infection or any other mask, helmet, or
device necessary to protect against exposure to any toxin, gas,
smoke, inclement weather, or any other hazardous or harmful envi-
ronmental condition, including but not limited to air-purifying
respirators, full or half masks, or self-contained breathing ap-
paratus;
(iii) A mask, helmet, or device necessary for underwater use, in-
cluding but not limited to a self-contained breathing apparatus;
(iv) A motorcycle helmet when worn by an officer utilizing a mo-
torcycle or other vehicle that requires a helmet for safe opera-
tions while in the performance of his duties; and
(v) Eyewear necessary to protect from the use of retinal weapons
such as lasers.
(b) "Law enforcement officer" means a peace officer, as defined in
section 19-5101, Idaho Code, employed by a city, county, or other lo-
cal agency as well as any officer or agent of a federal law enforcement
agency or any law enforcement agency of another state or any person
acting on behalf of a federal law enforcement agency or law enforcement
agency of another state.
(2) A law enforcement officer shall not wear a facial covering that con-
ceals or obscures his facial identity in the performance of his duties, ex-
cept as expressly authorized in this section.


(3) The provisions of this section shall not apply to:
(a) Active undercover operations or assignments authorized by super-
vising personnel or court order;
(b) Tactical operations where protective gear is required for physical
safety;
(c) Applicable law governing occupational health and safety;
(d) Protection of identity during prosecution;
(e) Officers assigned to special weapons and tactics (SWAT) team units
while actively performing their SWAT responsibilities; and
(f) Applicable law governing reasonable accommodations.
(4) A willful and knowing violation of this section shall be punishable
as an infraction or a misdemeanor.
(5) Notwithstanding any other law, any person who is found to have
committed an assault, battery, false imprisonment, false arrest, abuse of
process, or malicious prosecution against an individual while wearing a
facial covering in knowing and willful violation of the provisions of this
section shall not be entitled to assert any privilege or immunity for his
tortious conduct against a claim of civil liability and shall be liable to
that individual for actual damages or statutory damages of no less than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000), whichever is greater.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.